Wisconsin, session 2025, SB584.
do enact as follows:SB584,14Section 1. 1.10 (3) (w) and (x) of the statutes are created to read:SB584,1,551.10 (3) (w) The wild turkey (meleagris gallopavo) is the state game bird.SB584,1,66(x) The ruffed grouse (bonasa umbellus) is the state upland game bird.SB584,27Section 2. 1.10 (4) of the statutes is amended to read:SB584,2,511.10 (4) The Wisconsin Blue Book shall include the information contained in 2this section concerning the state song, ballad, waltz, dance, beverage, tree, grain, 3flower, bird, fish, animal, domestic animal, wildlife animal, dog, insect, fossil, 4mineral, rock, soil, fruit, tartan, pastry, dairy product, and herb, game bird, and 5upland game bird.SB584,2,66